California, session 20252026, SB355.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 96.9 is added to the Labor Code, to read:96.9. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, within 60 days of a final judgment being entered against an employer requiring payment to an employee or to the state pursuant to Section 98.2, the judgment debtor employer shall provide documentation to the Labor Commissioner that any of the following is true:(1) The judgment is fully satisfied.(2) The bond required by subdivision (a) of Section 238 has been posted.(3) The judgment debtor has entered into an agreement for the judgment to be paid in installments pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 238 and is in compliance with that agreement.(b) A judgment debtor employer who fails to comply with subdivision (a) shall be liable for a civil penalty of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) in a citation issued by the Labor Commissioner.(c) (1) If a judgment debtor employer does not comply with subdivision (a), the Labor Commissioner shall, no later than 30 days from the passing of the deadline set forth in subdivision (a), provide written notice to the judgment debtor employer that the Labor Commissioner will submit the unsatisfied judgment to the Tax Support Division of the Employment Development Department as a notice of potential tax fraud, and that the civil penalty prescribed by subdivision (b) is due within 90 days of the notice required by this subdivision.(2) The Labor Commissioner shall provide the written notice required by paragraph (1) by first-class mail at the last known address of the judgment debtor listed with the division.(d) If the judgment debtor employer does not both comply with subdivision (a) and pay the civil penalty prescribed by subdivision (b) within 90 days from the date of the notice required by subdivision (c), the Labor Commissioner shall, within 30 days, provide to the Employment Development Department a notice that includes both of the following:(1) A summary of the final judgment.(2) The names and identifying information of the persons or entities liable for payment of the judgment, including social security numbers, taxpayer identification numbers, and addresses.